Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1638SV (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 548 Section 1. Section 462A.9, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. a. Every vessel shall carry at least one life preserver, 3 life belt, ring buoy or other device, of the sort prescribed 4 by the rules of the commission, for each passenger, so placed 5 as to be readily accessible. This does not apply to a vessel 6 which that is a racing shell used in the sport of sculling or to 7 a sailboard while used for windsurfing. 8 b. A person shall not operate a personal watercraft on the 9 waters of this state under the jurisdiction of the commission 10 unless every person on board the personal watercraft is wearing 11 a type I, II, III, or V personal flotation device that is 12 approved by the United States coast guard, which may include a 13 device known as a âfloat coatâ that meets this standard, while 14 the personal watercraft is under way. A personal flotation 15 device described in this paragraph is not required to be worn 16 by a passenger of a personal watercraft if the person satisfies 17 all of the following: 18 (1) The person is at least eighteen years of age. 19 (2) The personal watercraft is moving at ten miles per hour 20 or less or is traveling in a no-wake zone. 21